Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.585

Computer science learning standards.

Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt computer science learning standards developed by a nationally recognized computer science education organization.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 3 s 1.]

NOTES: